Louisiana, session 2026, HB1084.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3384 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3384. Public postsecondary education institutions; tuition and fee authority and
autonomy
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each
public postsecondary education institution may establish and adjust tuition and fee
amounts for all programs offered by the institution, including programs granting
certificates, degrees, diplomas, or other credentials of value. This authority includes
establishing tuition and fee amounts for part-time students, dual enrollment students,
and students enrolled in summer and intersession terms.
(2) Each institution may increase tuition and mandatory fee amounts by no
more than ten percent over any one-year period. Each institution may lowertuition
and fee amounts with no limitation.
(3) The authority to establish and adjust tuition and fee amounts as provided
in this Section shall be applicable beginning on January 1, 2027.
B. When establishing tuition and fee amounts, each public postsecondary
education institution shall, at a minimum, consider the following:
(1) Tuition and fee amounts of peer institutions.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1084 ENROLLED
(2) Median household income in Louisiana and in states where peer
institutions are located.
(3) Affordability.
(4) Total cost of attendance.
C. Each public postsecondary education institution shall establish a process
for providing adequate notice to students of tuition and fee amounts. Prior to
imposing any increase in tuition and fee amounts pursuant to this Section, each
institution shall establish criteria for waivers in cases of financial hardship. Such
information shall be made available to all current and prospective students affected
by the increase in a timely manner.
D. Each public postsecondary education institution shall submit a written
report to its management board, the Board of Regents, the House Committee on
Education, the Senate Committee on Education, the House Committee on
Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance not later than February
fifteenth annually regarding how the tuition and mandatory fees authorized by this
Section are being implemented.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.